Illinois, session 104th, HB5062.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Commission to End Hunger Act is amended by 5changing Section 10 and by adding Section 25 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 5015/10)7    Sec. 10. Creation of the Commission to End Hunger.8    (a) The General Assembly authorizes the Department of 9Human Services to create the Commission to End Hunger.10    (b) The purpose of the Commission to End Hunger shall be to 11develop an action plan every 2 years, review the progress of 12this plan, and ensure cross-collaboration among government 13entities and community partners toward the goal of ending 14hunger in Illinois. 15    (c) Key duties of the Commission shall include the 16following:17        (1) Identify all funding sources which can be used 18    toward improving nutrition and ending hunger, for which 19    the State has administrative control, and develop 20    recommendations for future funding.21        (2) Identify barriers to access and develop 22    sustainable policies and programs to address those 23    barriers.  HB5062- 2 -LRB104 17512 WRO 30939 b1        (3) Promote and facilitate public-private 2    partnerships.3        (4) Develop benchmarks and set goals to indicate 4    success.5        (5) Report to the Governor and the General Assembly on 6    progress.7        (6) Convene and appoint the co-chairs of the SNAP 8    Response Working Group. 9(Source: P.A. 96-1119, eff. 7-20-10.) 10    (20 ILCS 5015/25 new)11    Sec. 25. SNAP Response Working Group.12    (a) As used in this Section:13    "Federal changes to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 14Program" or "federal changes to SNAP" means changes to the 15Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program under Public Law 16119-21 and any federal regulatory changes to the Supplemental 17Nutrition Assistance Program since the enactment of Public Law 18119-21. 19    "SNAP" means the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 20Program.21    "Working Group" means the SNAP Response Working Group 22established under this Section.23    (b) A SNAP Response Working Group shall be convened by the 24Illinois Commission to End Hunger for the purpose of:25        (1) evaluating the impacts of federal changes to the   HB5062- 3 -LRB104 17512 WRO 30939 b1    Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program under Public Law 2    119-21 on Illinois residents receiving or in need of food 3    assistance;4        (2) providing critical information and analysis to the 5    General Assembly about those impacts; and6        (3) making recommendations about how to prevent or 7    mitigate harm to Illinoisans who are receiving SNAP 8    benefits or who are otherwise in need of food assistance 9    as a result of the federal changes to the Supplemental 10    Nutrition Assistance Program.11    (c) The Working Group shall have two co-chairs who shall 12have the authority to determine meeting schedules, hearing 13schedules, and agendas. One co-chair shall be the 14representative of a food bank that serves a community of over 5 15million people. The other co-chair shall be either a member of 16the Illinois Senate or a member of the Illinois House of 17Representatives who has been appointed to the Working Group as 18set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection.19    (d) The Working Group shall be composed of 26 members 20appointed as follows:21        (1) 2 co-chairs of the Working Group, appointed by the 22    co-chairs of the Commission;23        (2) 2 members of the Illinois Senate, appointed by the 24    President of the Senate;25        (3) 2 members of the Illinois Senate, appointed by the 26    Senate Minority Leader;  HB5062- 4 -LRB104 17512 WRO 30939 b1        (4) 2 members of the Illinois House of 2    Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of 3    Representatives;4        (5) 2 members of the Illinois House of 5    Representatives, appointed by the House Minority Leader;6        (6) one member who is a representative of the Office 7    of the Governor, designated by the Governor;8        (7) the Director of Aging or the Director of Aging's 9    designee;10        (8) the Director of Healthcare and Family Services or 11    the Director of Healthcare and Family Services' designee;12        (9) the Secretary of Human Services or the Secretary 13    of Human Services' designee; and14        (10) the following 12 members, appointed by the 15    co-chairs of the Working Group:16            (A) one member who is a representative of a food 17        bank that serves a community of less than 5 million 18        people;19            (B) one member who is a representative of a mutual 20        aid organization that provides food assistance;21            (C) one member who is a representative of a 22        statewide coalition that represents human service 23        providers;24            (D) one member who is a representative of a 25        statewide business association that represents grocery 26        stores;  HB5062- 5 -LRB104 17512 WRO 30939 b1            (E) one member who is a representative of an 2        organization that provides domestic violence services;3            (F) one member who is a representative of an 4        organization that provides free legal services to 5        people experiencing poverty;6            (G) one member who is a representative of an 7        organization whose mission is to end homelessness;8            (H) one member who is a representative of an 9        organization that advocates on behalf of children;10            (I) one member who is a representative of an 11        organization that advocates on behalf of older adults;12            (J) one member who is a representative of an 13        organization that advocates on behalf of people with 14        disabilities;15            (K) one member who is a representative of an 16        advocacy organization dedicated to promoting the 17        leadership of low-income individuals and households, 18        many of whom participate in the SNAP, in chapters 19        statewide;20            (L) one member who is a representative of a union 21        representing front line State employees who administer 22        public benefits programs.23    (e) Members of the Working Group shall serve without 24compensation and shall be adults and residents of Illinois.25    (f) Appointments shall be made within 30 days after the 26effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General   HB5062- 6 -LRB104 17512 WRO 30939 b1Assembly.2    (g) The Directors of relevant State agencies, including 3the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, the 4Department on Aging, and the Department of Human Services, 5shall, to the extent practicable and subject to federal and 6State law, provide any relevant data requested by the Working 7Group regarding the potential impact of federal changes to 8SNAP, including any data, estimates, or projections about the 9SNAP payment error rate, SNAP participation, and projected 10costs.11    (h) The duties of the Working Group shall be as follows:12        (1) to review and analyze the federal changes to SNAP 13    and the timeline for those changes;14        (2) to gather and analyze data regarding the potential 15    impact of the federal changes to SNAP on Illinois 16    residents, including, but not limited to:17            (A) the number of people who will lose access to 18        SNAP benefits because of the federal changes, by 19        county, and, if possible, legislative district;20            (B) the potential disparate impact the federal 21        changes to SNAP will have on certain Illinois 22        residents, including, but not limited to, children, 23        older adults, immigrants, communities of color, people 24        experiencing homelessness, rural communities, 25        veterans, and people with disabilities;26            (C) the economic impact that a reduction or loss   HB5062- 7 -LRB104 17512 WRO 30939 b1        of SNAP benefits and the Supplemental Nutrition 2        Assistance Program overall will have on Illinois, on a 3        statewide basis, by county, and, if possible, 4        legislative district;5            (D) the impact of the federal changes to SNAP on 6        other State-funded services; and7            (E) the impact of federal changes to SNAP on the 8        capacity of the emergency food system;9        (3) to gather relevant estimates and data about 10    Illinois' SNAP payment error rate, including the monthly 11    State-reported error rate, and make projections about the 12    cost to the State to maintain the Supplemental Nutritional 13    Assistance Program in Illinois in federal Fiscal Year 14    2028; and15        (4) to identify non-SNAP food assistance available 16    across Illinois and evaluate its capacity to meet the 17    needs of the people of Illinois.18    (i) The Working Group shall submit:19        (1) a summary report to the General Assembly on or 20    before January 1, 2027, which, at minimum:21            (A) outlines the federal changes to SNAP;22            (B) identifies the number of State residents 23        impacted by those changes;24            (C) includes initial recommendations for State 25        action to prevent or mitigate harm to Illinois SNAP 26        benefit recipients or Illinois residents in need of   HB5062- 8 -LRB104 17512 WRO 30939 b1        food assistance resulting from the federal changes to 2        SNAP; and3            (D) projects the cost to the State to maintain the 4        Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program in federal 5        Fiscal Year 2028 as the program is implemented at the 6        time the report is issued; and7        (2) a full report to the General Assembly on or before 8    April 1, 2027, which includes:9            (A) an analysis of the impact of the federal 10        changes to SNAP on Illinois;11            (B) final recommendations for State action to 12        prevent or mitigate harm resulting from federal 13        changes to SNAP on SNAP benefit recipients or Illinois 14        residents in need of other food assistance;15            (C) an updated projection of the cost to the State 16        to maintain the Supplemental Nutrition Assistant 17        Program in federal Fiscal Year 2028 as the program is 18        implemented at the time that the report is issued; and19            (D) any other cost projections, including any 20        potential cost savings, related to the 21        recommendations.22    The Working Group shall also provide any additional 23relevant updates to its recommendations or projections to the 24General Assembly as appropriate.25    (j) The reports, projections, updates, or other relevant 26information regarding the Working Group shall be made   HB5062- 9 -LRB104 17512 WRO 30939 b1available by the Department of Human Services on its website.2    (k) Staff support for the Working Group, including 3scheduling, compilation of data, and drafting support, may be 4provided by staff of a food bank or other organization with a 5representative on the Working Group.6    (l) The Working Group is dissolved, and this Section is 7repealed, on May 31, 2027. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.